dix/not-common-apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
    <pardef n="nom__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nomf__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ino__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oj</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ino</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inoj</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ojn</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inon</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inojn</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="la__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mia__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dem__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ambaŭ__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ind__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quant__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="a">
        <i>a</i> 
        <par n="nom__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="adepto">
        <i>adept</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="albano">
        <i>alban</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="amato">
        <i>amat</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="anglo">
        <i>angl</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="arierulo">
        <i>arierul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="astrologo">
        <i>astrolog</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="aviadisto">
        <i>aviadist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bankiero">
        <i>bankier</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="birmano">
        <i>birman</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="brikisto">
        <i>brikist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiesulo">
        <i>ĉiesul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dekstrulo">
        <i>dekstrul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="diboĉulo">
        <i>diboĉul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="divenisto">
        <i>divenist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="egoisto">
        <i>egoist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="entomologo">
        <i>entomolog</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="filipinano">
        <i>filipinan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="franko">
        <i>frank</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="gastronomo">
        <i>gastronom</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="giganto">
        <i>gigant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="gufo">
        <i>guf</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="homeopato">
        <i>homeopat</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="instruanto">
        <i>instruant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="juristo">
        <i>jurist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kartografo">
        <i>kartograf</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kolombo">
        <i>kolomb</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kunulo">
        <i>kunul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lengadokano">
        <i>lengadokan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="majorkano">
        <i>majorkan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="metereologo">
        <i>metereolog</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nigravidulo">
        <i>nigravidul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="optimisto">
        <i>optimist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="partnero">
        <i>partner</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="peristo">
        <i>perist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="protestanto">
        <i>protestant</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="realisto">
        <i>realist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ronĝulo">
        <i>ronĝul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="siciliano">
        <i>sicilian</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="spertulo">
        <i>spertul</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ŝipekipisto">
        <i>ŝipekipist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="trapezisto">
        <i>trapezist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="urugvajano">
        <i>urugvajan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="zairano">
        <i>zairan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="talono">
        <i>talon</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="foliumilo">
        <i>foliumil</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kapitalisto">
        <i>kapitalist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="okulisto">
        <i>okulist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="banejgardisto">
        <i>banejgardist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="iber-amerikano">
        <i>iber-amerikan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="jankio">
        <i>janki</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="virŝafo">
        <i>virŝaf</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="egipto">
        <i>egipt</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="markadeto">
        <i>markadet</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="luksemburgia">
        <i>luksemburgi</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="zelanda">
        <i>zeland</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="parokano">
        <i>parokan</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="portisto">
        <i>portist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bopatro">
        <i>bopatr</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="anakoreto">
        <i>anakoret</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiĉerono">
        <i>ĉiĉeron</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="plumbisto">
        <i>plumbist</i> 
        <par n="ino__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la alia">
        <i>la<b/>alia</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la sama">
        <i>la<b/>sama</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la tuta">
        <i>la<b/>tuta</i> 
        <par n="ind__det" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kelka">
        <i>kelka</i> 
        <par n="quant__det" /> 
    </e>
